Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 11. Pre-Trial Procedure.

§ 33-13-251.
Charges and specifications.

Charges and specifications shall be signed by a person subject to this code under oath before a commissioned officer of the state military forces authorized to administer oaths and shall state:

That the signed has personal knowledge of, or has investigated the matters set forth therein; and

That they are true in fact to the best of his knowledge and belief.

Upon the preferring of charges, the proper authority shall take immediate steps to determine what disposition should be made thereof in the interest of justice and discipline, and the person accused shall be informed of the charges against him as soon as practicable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-31; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 31; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-253.
Compulsory self-incrimination prohibited.

No person subject to this code may compel any person to incriminate himself or to answer any question the answer to which may tend to incriminate him.

No person subject to this code may interrogate, or request any statement from an accused or a person suspected of any offense without first informing him of the nature of the accusation and advising him that he does not have to make any statement regarding the offense of which he is accused or suspected and that any statement made by him may be used as evidence against him in a trial by court-martial, and that certified military counsel will be detailed by competent authority, or by civilian counsel if provided by the accused or suspect.

No person subject to this code may compel any person to make a statement or produce evidence before any military tribunal if the statement or evidence is not material to the issue and may tend to degrade him.

No statement obtained from any person in violation of this section or through the use of coercion, unlawful influence, or unlawful inducement may be received in evidence against him in a trial by court-martial.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-32; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 32; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-255.
Investigation.

No charge or specification may be referred to a general court-martial for trial until a thorough and impartial investigation of all the matters set forth therein has been made. This investigation shall include inquiry as to the truth of the matter set forth in the charges, consideration of the form of charges and a recommendation as to the disposition which should be made of the case in the interest of justice and discipline.

The accused shall be advised of the charges against him and of his right to be represented at that investigation by counsel. Upon his own request, he shall be represented by civilian counsel if provided by him, or military counsel of his own selection if such counsel is reasonably available, or by counsel detailed by the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command. At that investigation, full opportunity shall be given to the accused to cross-examine witnesses against him if they are available and to present anything he may desire in his own behalf, either in defense or mitigation, and the investigating officer shall examine available witnesses requested by the accused. If the charges are forwarded after the investigation, they shall be accompanied by a statement of the substance of the testimony taken on both sides and a copy thereof shall be given to the accused.

If an investigation of the subject matter of an offense has been conducted before the accused is charged with the offense, and if the accused was present at the investigation and afforded the opportunities for representation, cross-examination and presentation prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, no further investigation of that charge is necessary under this section unless it is demanded by the accused after he is informed of the charge. A demand for further investigation entitles the accused to recall witnesses for further cross-examination and to offer any new evidence in his own behalf.

The requirements of this section are binding on all persons administering this code, but failure to follow them does not constitute jurisdictional error.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-33; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 33; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-257.
Forwarding of charges.

When a person is held for trial by general court-martial, the commanding officer shall, within eight (8) days after the accused is ordered into arrest or confinement, if practicable, forward the charges, together with the investigation and allied papers, to the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction. If that is not practicable, he shall report in writing to that officer the reasons for delay.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-34; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 34; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-259.
Advice of staff judge advocate and reference for trial.

Before directing the trial of any charge by general court-martial, the convening authority shall refer it to his staff judge advocate for consideration and advice. The convening authority may not refer a charge to a general court-martial for trial unless he has found that the charge alleges an offense under this code and is warranted by evidence indicated in the report of investigation.

If the charges or specifications are not formally correct or do not conform to the substance of the evidence contained in the report of the investigating officer, formal corrections and such changes in the charges and specifications as needed to make them conform to the evidence may be made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-35; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 35; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-261.
Service of charges.

The trial counsel to whom court-martial charges are referred for trial shall cause to be served upon the accused a copy of the charges upon which trial is to be had. In time of peace, no person may, against his objections, be brought to trial or be required to participate by himself or counsel in a session called by the military judge under Section 33-13-307(1) of this code in a general court-martial case within a period of five (5) days after the service of charges upon him, or in a special court-martial case within a period of three (3) days after the service of charges upon him.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-36; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 36; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1981.